Georgia statutes. 
(d) If a governmental entity requires a bid bond for any public works construction contract, no bid or proposal for a contract with the governmental entity shall be valid for any purpose unless the contractor shall give a bid bond with good and sufficient surety or sureties approved by the governing authority. The bid bond shall be in the amount of not less than 5 percent of the total amount payable by the terms of the contract. No bid or proposal shall be considered if a proper bid bond or other security authorized in Code Section 36-91-51 has not been submitted. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any bid or proposal for a contract that is required by law to be accompanied by a proposal guaranty and shall not apply to any bid or proposal for a contract with any public agency or body which receives funding from the United States Department of Transportation and which is primarily engaged in the business of public transportation.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-41, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-50, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 36-91-50 as present Code Section 36-91-70.

36-91-51. Cash in lieu of bid bonds; letters of credit.

Statute text

(a) In lieu of the bid bond provided for in Code Section 36-91-50, the governmental entity may accept a cashier's check, certified check, or cash in the amount of not less than 5 percent of the total amount payable by the terms of the contract payable to and for the protection of the governmental entity for which the contract is to be awarded.

(b) When the amount of any bid bond required under this article does not exceed $750,000.00, the governmental entity may, in its sole discretion, accept an irrevocable letter of credit issued by a bank or savings and loan association, as defined in Code Section 7-1-4, in the amount of and in lieu of the bond otherwise required under Code Section 36-91-50.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-42, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-51, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12; Ga. L. 2007, p. 209, § 1/HB 134.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 36-91-51 as present Code Section 36-91-71.

36-91-52. Bid and bidder defined; withdrawal of bids for appreciable errors; resubmission.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "bid" includes proposal and the term "bidder" includes offeror.

(b) Any governmental entity receiving bids subject to this article shall permit a bidder to withdraw a bid from consideration after the bid opening without forfeiture of the bid security if the bidder has made an appreciable error in the calculation of his or her bid and if:

(1) Such error in the calculation of his or her bid can be documented by clear and convincing written evidence;

(2) Such error can be clearly shown by objective evidence drawn from inspection of the original work papers, documents, or materials used in the preparation of the bid sought to be withdrawn;

(3) The bidder serves written notice upon the governmental entity which invited proposals for the work prior to the award of the contract and not later than 48 hours after the opening of bids, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays;

(4) The bid was submitted in good faith and the mistake was due to a calculation or clerical error, an inadvertent omission, or a typographical error as opposed to an error in judgment; and

(5) The withdrawal of the bid will not result in undue prejudice to the governmental entity or other bidders by placing them in a materially worse position than they would have occupied if the bid had never been submitted.

(c) In the event that an apparent successful bidder has withdrawn his or her bid as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, action on the remaining bids should be considered as though the withdrawn bid had not been received. In the event the project is relet for bids, under no circumstances shall a bidder who has filed a request to withdraw a bid be permitted to resubmit a bid for the work.

(d) No bidder who is permitted to withdraw a bid pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall for compensation supply any material or labor to, or perform any subcontract or other work agreement for, the person or firm to whom the contract is awarded or otherwise benefit, directly or indirectly, from the performance of the project for which the withdrawn bid was submitted.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-43, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-52, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 36-91-52 as present Code Section 36-91-72.

36-91-53. Affiliated corporation defined; forfeit of security by affiliated corporation.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Affiliated corporation" means, with respect to any corporation, any other corporation related thereto:

(A) As a parent corporation;

(B) As a subsidiary corporation;

(C) As a sister corporation;

(D) By common ownership or control; or

(E) By control of one corporation by the other.

(2) The term "bid" includes proposals.

(b) In any case where two or more affiliated corporations bid for a contract under this Code section and any one or more of such affiliated corporations subsequently rescind or revoke their bid or bids in favor of another such affiliated corporation whose bid is for a higher amount and the contract is awarded at such higher amount to such other affiliated corporation, then the bid bond, proposal guaranty, or other security otherwise required under this article of each affiliated corporation rescinding or revoking its bid shall be forfeited.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-44, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-53, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

36-91-54. Action on breach of bond.

Statute text

The obligee in any bid bond required to be given in accordance with this article shall be entitled to maintain an action thereon at any time upon any breach of such bond; provided, however, that no action may be instituted on the bonds or security deposits after one year from the completion of the contract and the acceptance of the public work by the governmental entity.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-45, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-54, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

——————————

PART 3

PERFORMANCE BONDS

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Article 4 (Code Sections 36-91-50 through 36-91-52) as Part 3 of Article 3.

36-91-70. Requirement of performance bonds.

Statute text

Performance bonds shall be required for all public works construction contracts subject to the requirements of this chapter with an estimated contract amount greater than $100,000.00; provided, however, that a governmental entity may require a performance bond for public works construction contracts that are estimated at $100,000.00 or less. No public works construction contract requiring a performance bond shall be valid for any purpose unless the contractor shall give such performance bond. The performance bond shall be in the amount of at least the total amount payable by the terms of the contract and shall be increased as the contract amount is increased.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-50, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-70, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 36-91-70 as present Code Section 36-91-90.

36-91-71. Acceptable substitutes for bond.

Statute text

When the amount of the performance bond required under this article does not exceed $750,000.00, the governmental entity may, in its sole discretion, accept an irrevocable letter of credit by a bank or savings and loan association, as defined in Code Section 7-1-4, in the amount of and in lieu of the bond otherwise required under this article.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-51, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-71, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12; Ga. L. 2007, p. 209, § 2/HB 134.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 36-91-71 as present Code Section 36-91-91.

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007).

36-91-72. Action on performance bond.

Statute text

The obligee in any performance bond required to be given in accordance with this article shall be entitled to maintain an action thereon at any time upon any breach of such bond; provided, however, no action can be instituted on the bonds or security deposits after one year from the completion of the contract and the acceptance of the public work by the governmental entity.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-52, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-72, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 36-91-72 as present Code Section 36-91-92.

36-91-73 through 36-91-75. Redesignated.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Sections 36-91-73 through 36-91-75 as present Code Sections 36-91-93 through 36-91-95, respectively.

——————————

PART 4

PAYMENT BONDS

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Article 5 (Code Sections 36-91-70 through 36-91-75) as Part 4 of Article 3.

36-91-90. Requirement for payment bonds.

Statute text

Payment bonds shall be required for all public works construction contracts subject to the requirements of this chapter with an estimated contract amount greater than $100,000.00; provided, however, that a governmental entity may require a payment bond for public works construction contracts that are estimated at $100,000.00 or less. No public works construction contract requiring a payment bond shall be valid for any purpose, unless the contractor shall give such payment bond; provided, however, that, in lieu of such payment bond, the governmental entity, in its discretion, may accept a cashier's check, certified check, or cash for the use and protection of all subcontractors and all persons supplying labor, materials, machinery, and equipment in the prosecution of work provided in the contract. The payment bond or other security accepted in lieu of a payment bond shall be in the amount of at least the total amount payable by the terms of the initial contract and shall be increased if requested by the governmental entity as the contract amount is increased.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-70, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-90, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on construction law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 55 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 59 (2008). For survey article on local government law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (2015).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Bond was adequate remedy at law for subcontractor on school project. - When a subcontractor on a school district's high school project had a remedy against the general contractor on the general contractor's performance bond under O.C.G.A. § 36-91-90, this legal remedy was adequate and precluded the subcontractor from asserting an equitable lien against the school district. McArthur Elec., Inc. v. Cobb County Sch. Dist., 281 Ga. 773, 642 S.E.2d 830 (2007).

Subcontractor, that received a transfer of funds by or on behalf of the debtor as the general contractor, argued its potential claim under O.C.G.A. § 36-91-93 of the Georgia Little Miller Act against the payment bond precluded the bankruptcy trustee from avoiding the transfer as a preference under 11 U.S.C. § 547, as constituting contemporaneous new value. The subcontractor also argued the funds were held in constructive trust, were earmarked, or were paid in the ordinary course of business. Watts v. Pride Util. Constr., Inc. (In re Sudco, Inc.), Bankr. (Bankr. N.D. Ga. Sept. 27, 2007).

Compliance with payment bond requirements. - When the general contractor failed to pay the subcontractor for the subcontractor's work on a city project and the surety was insolvent, and the subcontractor sued the general contractor and the city for the subcontractor's work, the trial court properly granted summary judgment in favor of the city because the city complied with the payment bond requirements, and the subcontractor was limited to the exclusive remedy set forth in Georgia's payment bond statutes, O.C.G.A. §§ 36-91-90 and 36-91-91. J. Squared Plumbing Company, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 337 Ga. App. 229, 786 S.E.2d 894 (2016).

Constructive trust created. - Constructive trust is created in favor of a subcontractor over funds paid by the owner of property to the contractor when the project is a public works project and the subcontractor enjoys no lien rights, but is entitled to file a claim against a payment bond in accordance with the Georgia Little Miller Act, O.C.G.A. § 36-91-90 et seq. Watts v. Pride Util. Constr., Inc. (In re Sudco, Inc.), Bankr. (Bankr. N.D. Ga. Sept. 27, 2007).

Emergency exception. - City was not required to obtain a payment bond in compliance with O.C.G.A. § 36-91-90 because the requirement did not apply to emergency projects, O.C.G.A. § 36-91-22(e); the city's description in the city's minutes of the "emergency replacement of a 10-inch sanitary sewer main on Embassy Drive" was sufficient to describe the nature of the emergency. City of College Park v. Sekisui SPR Ams., LLC, 331 Ga. App. 404, 771 S.E.2d 101 (2015), cert. denied, No. S15C1141, 2015 Ga. LEXIS 471 (Ga. 2015).

Cited in Complete Wiring Solutions, LLC v. Astra Group, Inc., 335 Ga. App. 723, 781 S.E.2d 597 (2016).

36-91-91. Liability of contracting party to subcontractors for noncompliance.

Statute text

If a payment bond or security deposit is not taken in the manner and form required in this article, the corporation or body for which work is done under the contract shall be liable to all subcontractors and to all persons furnishing labor, skill, tools, machinery, or materials to the contractor or subcontractor thereunder for any loss resulting to them from such failure. No agreement, modification, or change in the contract, change in the work covered by the contract, or extension of time for the completion of the contract shall release the sureties of such payment bond.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-71, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-91, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on construction law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 55 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 59 (2008). For annual survey of construction law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 23 (2015). For survey article on local government law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (2015).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Compliance with payment bond requirements. - When the general contractor failed to pay the subcontractor for the subcontractor's work on a city project and the surety was insolvent, and the subcontractor sued the general contractor and the city for the subcontractor's work, the trial court properly granted summary judgment in favor of the city because the city complied with the payment bond requirements, and the subcontractor was limited to the exclusive remedy set forth in Georgia's payment bond statutes, O.C.G.A. §§ 36-91-90 and 36-91-91. J. Squared Plumbing Company, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 337 Ga. App. 229, 786 S.E.2d 894 (2016).

Cited in McArthur Elec., Inc. v. Cobb County Sch. Dist., 281 Ga. 773, 642 S.E.2d 830 (2007).

36-91-92. Notice of commencement.

Statute text

(a) The contractor furnishing the payment bond or security deposit shall post on the public works construction site and file with the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the site is located a notice of commencement no later than 15 days after the contractor physically commences work on the project and supply a copy of the notice of commencement to any subcontractor, materialman, or person who makes a written request of the contractor. Failure to supply a copy of the notice of commencement within ten calendar days of receipt of the written request from the subcontractor, materialman, or person shall render the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 36-91-93 inapplicable to the subcontractor, materialman, or person making the request. The notice of commencement shall include:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the contractor;

(2) The name and location of the public work being constructed or a general description of the improvement;

(3) The name and address of the governmental entity that is contracting for the public works construction;

(4) The name and address of the surety for the performance and payment bonds, if any; and

(5) The name and address of the holder of the security deposit provided, if any.

(b) The failure to file a notice of commencement shall render the notice to contractor requirements of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 36-91-93 inapplicable.

(c) The clerk of the superior court shall file the notice of commencement within the records of that office and maintain an index separate from other real estate records or an index with the preliminary notices specified in subsection (a) of Code Section 44-14-361.3. Each such notice of commencement shall be indexed under the name of the governmental entity and the name of the contractor as contained in the notice of commencement.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-72, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-92, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12; Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 8/SB 179.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Summary judgment improperly granted. - In an action on a public works payment bond under O.C.G.A. §§ 36-91-92 and 36-91-93, a trial court erred in granting summary judgment to a surety because a material issue of fact existed as to whether a general contractor complied with the notice of commencement requirements so as to fall under the provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-91-93(a)(2), or whether the general contractor received a sub-subcontractor's request but failed to comply and thus fell under the provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-91-93(a)(1). Southway Crane & Rigging v. Fed. Ins. Co., 294 Ga. App. 504, 669 S.E.2d 482 (2008).

36-91-93. Rights of persons protected by payment bond or security deposit; governmental entity not a party.

Statute text

(a) Every person entitled to the protection of the payment bond or security deposit required to be given who has not been paid in full for labor or material furnished in the prosecution of the work referred to in such bond or security deposit before the expiration of a period of 90 days after the day on which the last of the labor was done or performed by such person or the material or equipment or machinery was furnished or supplied by such person for which such claim is made, or when he or she has completed his or her subcontract for which claim is made, shall have the right to bring an action on such payment bond or security deposit for the amount, or the balance thereof, unpaid at the time of the commencement of such action and to prosecute such action to final execution and judgment for the sum or sums due such person; provided, however, that:

(1) Any person having a direct contractual relationship with a subcontractor but no contractual relationship, express or implied, with the contractor furnishing such payment bond or security deposit on a public works construction project where the contractor has not complied with the notice of commencement requirements shall have the right of action upon the payment bond or security deposit upon giving written notice to the contractor within 90 days from the day on which such person did or performed the last of the labor or furnished the last of the material or machinery or equipment for which such claim is made, stating with substantial accuracy the amount claimed and the name of the party to whom the material was furnished or supplied or for whom the labor was performed or done. The notice to the contractor may be served by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, or statutory overnight delivery, duly addressed to the contractor, at any place at which the contractor maintains an office or conducts his or her business or at his or her residence, by depositing such notice in any post office or branch post office or any letter box under the control of the United States Postal Service; alternatively, notice may be served in any manner in which the sheriffs of this state are authorized by law to serve summons or process; and

(2) Any person having a direct contractual relationship with a subcontractor but no contractual relationship, express or implied, with the contractor furnishing such payment bond or security deposit on a public works construction project where the contractor has complied with the notice of commencement requirements in accordance with subsection (a) of Code Section 36-91-92 shall have the right of action on the payment bond or security deposit, provided that such person shall, within 30 days from the filing of the notice of commencement or 30 days following the first delivery of labor, material, machinery, or equipment, whichever is later, give to the contractor a written notice setting forth:

(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the person providing labor, material, machinery, or equipment;

(B) The name and address of each person at whose instance the labor, material, machinery, or equipment is being furnished;

(C) The name and the location of the public works construction site; and

(D) A description of the labor, material, machinery, or equipment being provided and, if known, the contract price or anticipated value of the labor, material, machinery, or equipment to be provided or the amount claimed to be due, if any.

(b) Nothing contained in this Code section shall limit the right of action of a person entitled to the protection of the payment bond or security deposit required to be given pursuant to this article to the 90 day period following the day on which such person did or performed the last of the labor or furnished the last of the material or machinery or equipment for which such claim is made.

(c) Every action instituted under this Code section shall be brought in the name of the claimant without making the governmental entity for which the work was done or was to be done a party to such action.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-73, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-93, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Bond precluded bankruptcy trustee from avoiding transfer. - Subcontractor, that received a transfer of funds by or on behalf of the debtor as the general contractor, argued the subcontractor's potential claim under O.C.G.A. § 36-91-93 of the Georgia Little Miller Act against the payment bond precluded the bankruptcy trustee from avoiding the transfer as a preference under 11 U.S.C. § 547, as constituting contemporaneous new value. The subcontractor also argued the funds were held in constructive trust, were earmarked, or were paid in the ordinary course of business. Watts v. Pride Util. Constr., Inc. (In re Sudco, Inc.), Bankr. (Bankr. N.D. Ga. Sept. 27, 2007).

Summary judgment improperly granted. - In an action on a public works payment bond under O.C.G.A. §§ 36-91-92 and 36-91-93, a trial court erred in granting summary judgment to a surety because a material issue of fact existed as to whether a general contractor complied with the notice of commencement requirements so as to fall under the provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-91-93(a)(2), or whether the general contractor received a sub-subcontractor's request but failed to comply and thus fell under the provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-91-93(a)(1). Southway Crane & Rigging v. Fed. Ins. Co., 294 Ga. App. 504, 669 S.E.2d 482 (2008).

36-91-94. Providing copy of bond or security deposit agreement.

Statute text

The official who has the custody of the bond or security deposit required by this article is authorized and directed to furnish to any person making application therefor a copy of the bond or security deposit agreement and the contract for which it was given, certified by the official who has custody of the bond or security deposit. With his or her application, such person shall also submit an affidavit that he or she has supplied labor or materials for such work and that payment therefor has not been made or that he or she is being sued on any such bond or security deposit. Such copy shall be primary evidence of the bond or security deposit and contract and shall be admitted in evidence without further proof. Applicants shall pay for such certified copies and such certified statements such fees as the official fixes to cover the cost of preparation thereof, provided that in no case shall the fee fixed exceed the fees which the clerks of the superior courts are permitted to charge for similar copies.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-74, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-94, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

36-91-95. Time limitation.

Statute text

No action can be instituted on the payment bonds or security deposits after one year from the completion of the contract and the acceptance of the public works construction by the proper public authorities. Every action instituted under this article shall be brought in the name of the claimant, without the governmental entity for which the work was done or was to be done being made a party thereto.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-75, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-95, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Claims arising under payment bond were time-barred. - Summary judgment was properly entered for a surety on a subcontractor's breach of an implied contract, bad faith breach of contract, promissory estoppel, and unjust enrichment claims as all of the claims arose from work performed while the surety was acting as surety on the payment bond and from the surety's refusal to pay the subcontractor under the payment bond; thus, O.C.G.A. § 36-91-95 applied and the claims were time barred. Masonry Specialists of Ga., Inc. v. United States Fid. & Guar. Co., 273 Ga. App. 774, 616 S.E.2d 103 (2005).

Suit on payment bond was time-barred. - Summary judgment was properly entered for a surety on a subcontractor's suit on a payment bond as the surety produced an affidavit stating that the project was completed and dedicated more than one year before the suit was filed; and the subcontractor failed to show that the affiant was not authorized to accept the completed project. Masonry Specialists of Ga., Inc. v. United States Fid. & Guar. Co., 273 Ga. App. 774, 616 S.E.2d 103 (2005).

Cited in Complete Wiring Solutions, LLC v. Astra Group, Inc., 335 Ga. App. 723, 781 S.E.2d 597 (2016).

——————————

ARTICLE 4

BIDDING FOR GOVERNMENT WORKS PROJECTS

Annotations

Cross references. - State and private participation in water projects, § 50-23-28.2.

36-91-100. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Affected local government" means any county, municipality, or consolidated government in which water storage facilities of a project are located or proposed to be located, which will receive for local use water or services from such project, or which, under a service delivery agreement entered into pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 70 of this title, provides or is authorized to provide within an area water facilities or services similar to water facilities and services proposed to be provided by a project in such area.

(2) "Lead local authority" means the sole local governing authority or local authority participating in a project or the local governing authority or local authority designated pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 36-91-102.

(3) "Local authority" means any local water authority created by Act of the General Assembly, any authority created pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 62 of this title, and any authority created by a county, municipality, or consolidated government which provides water, sewer, or waste-water treatment services.

(4) "Local governing authority" means any county, municipality, or consolidated government.

(5) "Project" has the meaning provided by paragraph (10) of Code Section 12-5-471 and includes environmental facilities as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of Code Section 50-23-4.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-100, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 52, § 1/SB 122; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

36-91-101. Authority to enter into contracts; costs; grants or loans; eminent domain.

Statute text

(a) Local governing authorities and local authorities shall be authorized to enter into contracts provided for by this article with private persons, firms, associations, or corporations providing for or delegating the responsibility for procuring all permits, licenses, and permissions from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof; the State of Georgia, its departments, agencies, or authorities; or any county or municipality of this state as necessary or required for the purpose of constructing projects within this state, and to plan, finance, construct, acquire, lease, operate, or maintain such projects or cause such projects to be planned, financed, constructed, acquired, leased, operated, or maintained. Such contracts may provide for the reimbursement to the private person, firm, association, or corporation of costs and expenses associated with the execution thereof through service payments, user fees, purchase payments, and such other consideration as the local governing authority or local authority may deem appropriate. Such contracts may provide for the assumption by such local governing authority or local authority of such projects, permits, licenses, and permissions at such times as appropriate for the construction of the project or as otherwise agreed upon.

(b) A local governing authority or local authority may take any action to obtain federal, state, or local assistance for a project that serves the public purpose of this article and may enter into any contracts required to receive such assistance. A local governing authority or local authority may determine that it serves the public purpose of this article for all or any portion of the costs of a project to be paid, directly or indirectly, from the proceeds of a grant or loan made by the federal, state, or local government or any instrumentality thereof. A local governing authority or local authority may agree to make grants or loans to the operator of a project from time to time from amounts received from the federal, state, or local government or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to delegate the power of eminent domain to any private entity with respect to any project commenced or proposed pursuant to this article. Any local governing authority may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by law for the purpose of acquiring any property or interests therein to the extent that such action serves the public purpose of this article.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-101, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 52, § 1/SB 122.)

36-91-102. Planning, finance, construction, acquisition, leasing, operation, and maintenance of projects; implementation; lobbying restrictions.

Statute text

(a) In addition to other methods of procurement authorized by law, local governing authorities and local authorities shall be authorized to utilize the procedures of this article to provide for the planning, finance, construction, acquisition, leasing, operation, and maintenance of projects. The provisions of this article shall be an alternative to such other methods to be exercised at the option of each local governing authority or local authority.

(b) After identifying or being informed of any project that may be suitable for utilization of the procedures of this article, one or more local governing authorities and local authorities may participate in consideration and implementation of a project. Where more than one local governing authority or local authority agrees to participate in consideration or implementation of a project, the participants shall designate one of their number to be the lead local authority for purposes of implementing the procedures of this article; provided, however, that not less than one representative of each such participating local governing authority or local authority, as agreed to by such local governing authorities or local authorities, shall have the right to participate in all aspects of such implementation.

(c) (1) The lead local authority shall evaluate a project to determine, in the judgment of the lead local authority, appropriate or desirable levels of state, local, and private participation in financing, constructing, and operating such project. In making such determinations, the lead local authority shall seek the advice and input of affected local governments and is encouraged to seek the advice and input of the Water Supply Division of the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority, affected local governing authorities, applicable planning organizations, and the private financial and construction sectors.

(2) The lead local authority shall be authorized to issue a written request for proposals indicating the scope of the project, the proposed financial participations in the project, and the factors that will be used in evaluating the proposals as well as the relative importance of the evaluation factors, and containing or incorporating by reference other applicable contractual terms and conditions, including any unique capabilities or qualifications that will be required of the contractor. Public notice of such request for proposal shall be made at least 90 days prior to the date set for receipt of proposals by posting the legal notice on the websites of each participating local governing authority and local authority in substantially the same manner utilized by such authority to solicit requests for proposals, with a copy of such notice provided simultaneously to each affected local government.

(3) Upon receipt of a proposal or proposals responsive to the request for proposals, the lead local authority shall accept written public comment, solicited in the same manner as provided for notice of proposals, for a period of 30 days beginning at least ten days after the date set for receipt of proposals. In addition, the lead local authority shall hold at least one public hearing on such proposals within the jurisdiction of each participating local governing authority, participating local authority, or affected local government not later than the conclusion of the period for public comment.

(4) (A) The lead local authority, acting by and through a designated representative appointed for such purposes, and with the participation of any designated representatives of other participating local governing authorities or local authorities, shall engage in individual discussions with each respondent deemed fully qualified, responsible, and suitable on the basis of initial responses and with emphasis on professional competence and ability to meet the level of private financial participation called for by the local governing authority. Repetitive informal interviews shall be permissible. Any affected local governments shall receive ten days' notice of any such individual discussions and interviews and may participate through an appointed representative. In the event that the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority or any other state authority or agency agrees to consider or participate in the project, a representative of such authority or agency appointed by such authority or agency may participate in such discussions and interviews.

(B) At the discussion stage, the representatives may discuss estimates of total project costs, including, but not limited to, life cycle costing and nonbinding estimates of price for services. Discussions conducted with respondents pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be public meetings subject to the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50. Proprietary information or trade secrets may be designated by a respondent as subject to one or more exemptions from public disclosure pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 50-18-72, but such designation shall not be binding on the participating local governing authorities, local authorities, and affected local governments unless consistent with applicable law.

(C) (i) At the conclusion of the discussion stage, on the basis of evaluation factors published in the request for proposal and all information developed in the selection process, the designated representative, with the input of the representatives of any other participating entity and in an open and public meeting subject to the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50, shall select in the order of preference one or more respondents whose qualifications and proposed services are deemed most meritorious.

(ii) Negotiations shall then be conducted by the designated representative with the selected respondents. A representative of any participating local governing authority, participating local authority, and participating state agency or authority shall have the right to notice of and participation in such negotiations. Negotiations conducted with selected respondents pursuant to this division shall not be public meetings subject to the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50.

(D) The designated representative shall select for approval by the lead local authority the respondent for project implementation based upon contract terms that are the most satisfactory and advantageous to the participating local governing authorities and local authorities based upon a thorough assessment of value and the ability of the final project's characteristics to meet the goals of the participating local governing authorities and local authorities, consistent with applicable state-wide and regional water plans and local comprehensive plans. Before making such selection, the designated representative shall consult in an open and public meeting subject to the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50 with the representatives of any participating local governing authority, participating local authority, participating state agency or authority, and affected local government. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the terms and conditions for multiple awards are included in the request for proposal, the lead local authority may award contracts to more than one respondent. Should the lead local authority determine in writing that only one respondent is fully qualified, or that one respondent is clearly more highly qualified and suitable than the others under consideration, a contract may be negotiated and awarded to that respondent.

(E) Upon approval of the selection by the lead local authority, a contract or contracts not exceeding 50 years in duration may be entered into with the selected respondents on behalf of all participating entities, subject to approval by each such participating entity and by each affected local government.
